Utah statutes.
76-6-508.   Bribery of or receiving bribe by person in the business of selection, appraisal, or criticism of goods or services.

(1)  A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor when, without the consent of the employer or principal, contrary to the interests of the employer or principal:

(a)  he confers, offers, or agrees to confer upon the employee, agent, or fiduciary of an employer or principal any benefit with the purpose of influencing the conduct of the employee, agent, or fiduciary in relating to his employer's or principal's affairs; or

(b)  he, as an employee, agent, or fiduciary of an employer or principal, solicits, accepts, or agrees to accept any benefit from another upon an agreement or understanding that such benefit will influence his conduct in relation to his employer's or principal's affairs; provided that this section does not apply to inducements made or accepted solely for the purpose of causing a change in employment by an employee, agent, or fiduciary.

(2)  A person is guilty of violation of this section if he holds himself out to the public as being engaged in the business of making disinterested selection, appraisal, or criticism of goods or services and he solicits, accepts, or agrees to accept any benefit to influence his selection, appraisal, or criticism.



Amended by Chapter 241, 1991 General Session

